South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1030.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  It is proposed that Section 20, Article I of the Constitution of this State be amended to read: Section 20. (A) The right to bear arms in defense of himself is a fundamental right possessed by each individual citizen of this State. Any restriction on this right shall be subject to strict scrutiny. (B) No citizen shall be compelled by any international treaty or international law to take an action that prohibits, limits, or otherwise interferes with his personal, fundamental right to keep and bear arms in defense of himself, and the state, if the international treaty or international law, or its adoption, violates the United States Constitution. (C) A well regulated militia being necessary to the security of a free State, the right of the people to keep and bear arms shall not be infringed. As, in times of peace, armies are dangerous to liberty, they shall not be maintained without the consent of the General Assembly. The military power of the State shall always be held in subordination to the civil authority and be governed by it. No soldier shall in time of peace be quartered in any house without the consent of the owner nor in time of war but in the manner prescribed by law. SECTION 2.  The proposed amendment must be submitted to the qualified electors at the next general election for representatives.  Ballots must be provided at the various voting precincts with the following words printed or written on the ballot: "Must Section 20, Article I of the Constitution of this State, relating to the right to keep and bear arms, be amended so as to provide that each individual citizen of this State has the fundamental right to keep and bear arms that cannot be infringed by international treaty or international law that violates the United States Constitution? Yes     o No      o Those voting in favor of the question shall deposit a ballot with a check or cross mark in the square after the word 'Yes', and those voting against the question shall deposit a ballot with a check or cross mark in the square after the word 'No'." ----XX----